Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-937
New or former resident; list of voters; public record.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall keep open to public inspection a list of all persons voting in the county as new or former residents which shows their names, addresses, and application dates. The election commissioner or county clerk shall record the name of any person voting pursuant to section 32-933 in the list of voters book with a notation designating him or her as a new or former resident voting for President and Vice President of the United States only.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 280.